District of Columbia statutes.
28-4806.03

Transitional matters.

Section 28-4804.09 applies to a trust described in § 28-4804.09(d) on and after the following dates:

(1)

If the trust is not funded as of [July 23, 2010], the date of the decedent’s death;

(2)

If the trust is initially funded in the calendar year beginning January 1, 2010, the date of the decedent’s death; or

(3)

If the trust is not described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this section, January 1, 2010.

History

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-197, § 2(d), 57 DCR 4524